Ohio, session 136, HB514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 149.437 and 2950.036 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 149.437. (A) As used in this section: "Minor" has the same meaning as in section 2108.01 of the Revised Code. "Restricted video" means video taken by a public office depicting a minor at a public recreational facility with water activities. "Sex offender" has the same meaning as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (B) A video record kept by a public office that is a restricted video record is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code and is not subject to inspection or copying under that section. (C) An individual who seeks to obtain a copy of a restricted video shall submit a written request to the public office. The request shall describe the purpose of the request and the intended use of the record. Upon receipt of a request for a restricted video, made and signed by an individual, the public office shall determine if the requester is a sex offender, and shall ascertain, from the local law enforcement agency, if the requester is under investigation for the commission of a criminal offense involving minors, or involving stalking or harassment of an individual depicted in the restricted video. (D) Notwithstanding division (B) of this section, a public office or person responsible for public records, having custody of a restricted video, may transmit a copy of the restricted video, in the same manner as a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code, to a requester determined, by the public office, not to be a sex offender, and not under investigation for the commission of a criminal offense involving minors, or involving stalking or harassment of an individual depicted in the restricted video. Sec. 2950.036. (A) As used in this section, "library box" includes a structure or container of any shape, size, or design that serves as a repository for a community lending library. (B) No person who has been convicted of, is convicted of, has pleaded guilty to, or pleads guilty to a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense shall recklessly establish or maintain a library box. (C) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of unlawfully establishing or maintaining a library box, a misdemeanor of the first degree.